Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF64.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1678XS (3) 91 jm/md S.F. 64 Section 1. Section 257.14, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. For the budget year commencing July 1, 2016, and 3 succeeding budget years, a school district shall be eligible 4 for a budget adjustment in an amount equal to the difference 5 between the regular program district cost for the budget year 6 and one hundred one percent of the regular program district 7 cost for the base year. 8 b. If a school district receives a budget adjustment under 9 this section in the base year and during such base year or 10 the budget year preceding the base year a natural disaster 11 impacts the school district for which a major disaster has 12 been declared to exist by the president of the United States 13 or for which the governor has proclaimed a state of disaster 14 emergency, the school district shall be eligible for a budget 15 adjustment in an amount equal to the amount of the school 16 districtâs budget adjustment for the base year. 17